Michigan, session 2025-2026, SB0763.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 32707a. If a person that holds a permit under section 32723 proposes to increase withdrawal capacity beyond the amount reported in the most recent annual report submitted under section 32707(1) and the proposed increase will result in necessary infrastructure improvements to accommodate an increased withdrawal capacity, the person that holds the permit shall not pass on to the public any costs associated with the infrastructure improvements. Enacting section 1. This amendatory act does not take effect unless all of the following bills of the 103rd Legislature are enacted into law: (a) Senate Bill No. ____ (request no. S00862'25) or House Bill No. ____ (request no. H00862'25). (b) Senate Bill No. ____ (request no. S01932'25) or House Bill No. ____ (request no. H01932'25).